Washington statutes.
RCW 36.22.215

Process servers—Social security numbers.

(1) The legislature finds that the dissemination of social security numbers of process servers is not in the public interest.

(2) A county auditor collecting social security numbers from process servers required to register under RCW 18.180.010 shall not display or release a process server's social security number on any document or website issued or maintained by the auditor. Social security numbers of process servers required to register under RCW 18.180.010 are confidential, are exempt from public inspection and copying, and shall not be disclosed except as otherwise explicitly required to be disclosed under federal law.

[ 2015 c 56 s 1.]